Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Joinder of Supervisors Districts of Adjacent Counties in Establishing Industrial Enterprises

§ 57-1-131.
Declaration of intention; petition for certificate; constitution of board of commissioners; petition of electors.

When two or more adjoining supervisors districts of adjacent counties which desire to enter jointly into the establishment of an enterprise under the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, the board of supervisors of each county shall declare its intention of entering into such plan by resolution spread upon its minutes and shall jointly with the boards of supervisors of the counties affected file with the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, a petition for a certificate of public convenience and necessity in the manner and for the purposes prescribed by Section 57-1-21, and the board of supervisors of each county affected shall name two commissioners who, together with the commissioners appointed by the other counties acting jointly with them, shall constitute a board of commissioners for the purpose of proceeding the same as if the supervisors districts of the adjacent counties were within the same county.

A petition bearing the signatures of a majority of the qualified electors of a supervisors district filed with the chancery clerk, shall make it the mandatory duty of the board of supervisors of the county to pass the necessary resolution, appoint the commissioners and perform all other duties and functions necessary for the establishment of the enterprise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8938-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 245, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 148.

§ 57-1-133.
Election.

Should a certificate of public convenience and necessity be issued by the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, the boards of supervisors of each of the counties affected shall call an election in each of the supervisors districts affected in the manner and method for calling, conducting and holding elections provided in Section 57-1-25, and should two-thirds of the qualified electors residing in each of the supervisors districts affected voting in the election, vote in favor of the enterprise, the supervisors districts included in the petition for public convenience and necessity shall be deemed a municipality within the meaning of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, and shall have all rights, powers and authority granted to municipalities as defined in said sections and by said sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8938-02; Laws, 1946, ch. 245, § 2.

§ 57-1-135.
Appointment, terms of office, organization, and meetings of board of commissioners.

The commissioners authorized by Section 57-1-131 shall be deemed to be the governing body of the municipality. Except as hereinafter provided, the term of each commissioner shall be four (4) years, and until his successor shall have been appointed in like manner and shall have qualified. In case of death, disability or resignation, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment to be made by the board of supervisors of the county in which such vacancy occurred. Of the two (2) commissioners first appointed by each county, one (1) shall be designated to serve for a term of two (2) years, and the other shall be designated to serve for a term of four (4) years, and until their respective successors shall have been appointed and qualified. The aforesaid designations shall be made by the respective boards of supervisors. Such commissioners shall constitute a board, and shall organize by electing a president and a secretary, and by adopting an official seal with which to attest its official acts, and by adopting a name by which the municipality formed by the districts involved shall be known and recognized. The adoption of a name for any such municipality prior to the enactment of this statute is hereby validated and confirmed. The commissioners shall meet at such time and place as they may determine, shall keep full, complete and permanent minutes of their meetings and records of their proceedings, and shall receive no compensation for their services, except reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred by them in traveling in performance of their duties. No action taken by such commissioners and no contract or agreement entered into by them shall be valid and effectual unless and until the same is approved by the board of supervisors of each county having territory involved, by resolution spread at large upon the minutes of such board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8938-03; Laws, 1946, ch. 245, § 3; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess. ch. 26, eff from and after passage (approved Nov. 15, 1962).

§ 57-1-137.
Rights, powers and authority of municipalities generally.

For the purpose of operating or engaging in the enterprise as authorized at the election held for that purpose, the municipality herein authorized acting through its board of commissioners and subject to the approval of the boards of supervisors of each of the counties having territory included within such municipality shall have all the rights, powers, and authority granted to municipalities by Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8938-08; Laws, 1946, ch. 245, § 8.

§ 57-1-139.
Issuance of bonds; contracts.

The board of commissioners of the municipality as defined in Section 57-1-133, subject to the approval of the boards of supervisors of each county having territory involved, may issue such bonds as may be authorized in the election held for the operation of the enterprise, and may make all contracts for the erection of buildings and structures and the acquisition and purchase of lands, and for the operation of such enterprise. All such contracts so entered into by such commissioners shall not be valid, however, until approved by resolution spread at large upon the minutes of each of the boards of supervisors of the counties having territory included in the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8938-04; Laws, 1946, ch. 245, § 4.

§ 57-1-141.
Execution of bonds.

The bonds issued under Section 57-1-139 shall be signed by the president of the board of commissioners, counter-signed by the clerk of said board of commissioners, and shall pledge the full faith and credit of the supervisors districts included in the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8938-05; Laws, 1946, ch. 245, § 5.

§ 57-1-143.
Depository.

The board of commissioners of the municipality as defined in Section 57-1-133 shall designate a depository for the funds of the municipality in the same manner as county depositories are designated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8938-06; Laws, 1946, ch. 245, § 6.

§ 57-1-145.
Tax levy.

On or before the first Monday of September of each year, the board of commissioners for the municipality comprising two or more supervisors districts of adjacent counties shall meet and levy a tax sufficient upon the taxable property of the territory to provide funds for the payment of interest on bonds and the payment of bonds maturing within one year, and to provide a sinking fund for the redemption of any outstanding bond and shall certify such levy to the boards of supervisors of each of the counties affected, prior to the date on which county tax levies are fixed, and it shall be the duty of the respective boards of supervisors to levy the tax prescribed by the board of commissioners of the municipality upon the taxable property of the territory of the county which is embraced in the municipality. The tax collector of each county shall thereupon collect such tax in the same manner and at the same time as other taxes are collected and shall transmit the proceeds thereof to the proper depositories.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8938-07; Laws, 1946, ch. 245, § 7.